Florida, session 2026, HB657.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
139
140 Section 1. Section 712.13, Florida Statutes, is created to
141 read:
142 712.13 Governing documents associated with dissolved
143 homeowners' associations.—
144 (1) The Legislature finds that when a homeowners'
145 association has been dissolved, voluntarily or involuntarily,
146 the recorded governing documents created solely for the
147 association's benefit may remain in the county records
148 indefinitely, imposing an undue burden on private property
149 owners. It is the intent of the Legislature to restore and
150 protect private property rights by ensuring that such
Page 6 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
151 encumbrances are properly extinguished or removed from the
152 official records of the county when the association ceases to
153 exist.
154 (2) As used in this section, the term:
155 (a) "Dissolved association" means a homeowners'
156 association that has filed articles of dissolution with the
157 Department of State under chapter 617 or has otherwise ceased
158 its legal operation and existence.
159 (b) "Exclusive easement" means an easement recorded for
160 the sole benefit or use of a homeowners' association or its
161 members.
162 (c) "Governing documents" has the same meaning as in s.
163 720.301.
164 (d) "Servient estate" means the real property burdened by
165 an easement.
166 (3)(a) Upon the dissolution of a homeowners' association,
167 the governing documents of the association, which were recorded
168 in the official records of a county and created solely for the
169 operation or benefit of the dissolved association or its
170 members, are deemed terminated and are unenforceable.
171 (b) The recorded governing documents may not be construed
172 to create any rights for the general public or for any successor
173 entity unless expressly provided by law.
174 (c) The clerk of the circuit court shall, upon receipt of
175 a certified copy of the association's articles of dissolution,
Page 7 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
176 mark or otherwise indicate in the county's official records that
177 the governing documents for the dissolved association are
178 terminated and inactive.
179 (4)(a) An exclusive easement created for the benefit of a
180 homeowners' association or its members must revert to the
181 servient estate upon dissolution of the association if the owner
182 of the servient estate has continuously paid his or her ad
183 valorem taxes on the land encumbered by the easement.
184 (b) Upon reversion, the exclusive easement is extinguished
185 and the owner of the servient estate regains full rights of
186 ownership, possession, and control of the land encumbered by the
187 easement.
188 (c) An easement formerly held by a homeowners' association
189 may not become a public right-of-way, trail, or access route
190 unless a separate, valid written notice in accordance with s.
191 712.06 has been recorded to preserve the easement for the
192 benefit of the public.
193 (5) This section does not impair or extinguish easements,
194 covenants, or restrictions benefiting individual property owners
195 which were separately recorded or preserved under this chapter.
196 (6) This section applies both prospectively and
197 retroactively to homeowners' associations dissolved before, on,
198 or after July 1, 2026.
199 Section 2. Subsections (19) through (35) of section
200 718.103, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (20)
Page 8 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
201 through (36), respectively, present subsection (33) is amended,
202 and a new subsection (19) is added to that section, to read:
203 718.103 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
204 (19) "Habitable" means a space in a building for living,
205 sleeping, eating, or cooking. Garages, carports, and storage or
206 utility spaces are not considered habitable.
207 (34)(33) "Video conference" means a real-time audio- and
208 video-based meeting between two or more people in different
209 locations using video-enabled and audio-enabled devices. The
210 notice for any meeting that is open to the unit owners and will
211 be conducted by video conference must have a hyperlink and call-
212 in conference telephone number for unit owners to attend the
213 meeting and must have a physical location where unit owners can
214 also attend the meeting in person. All meetings conducted by
215 video conference which are open to the unit owners must be
216 recorded, and such recording must be maintained as an official
217 record of the association.
218 Section 3. Subsection (8) is added to section 718.104,
219 Florida Statutes, to read:
220 718.104 Creation of condominiums; contents of
221 declaration.—Every condominium created in this state shall be
222 created pursuant to this chapter.
223 (8)(a) Each association formed on or after July 1, 2026,
224 must include the following statement in the governing documents:
225
Page 9 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
226 This association and the association's governing
227 documents are governed by the Florida Condominium Act,
228 as amended from time to time.
229
230 (b) By January 1, 2027, each association in existence
231 before July 1, 2026, must hold a meeting of the members in
232 accordance with s. 718.112 to vote whether to amend the
233 governing documents of the association to include the statement
234 in paragraph (a). The association must obtain the affirmative
235 approval of two-thirds of the units at a meeting of the
236 membership at which a quorum has been attained in order to amend
237 the governing documents under this paragraph.
238 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (12) of section
239 718.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
240 718.111 The association.—
241 (12) OFFICIAL RECORDS.—
242 (c)1.a. The official records of the association are open
243 to inspection by any association member and any person
244 authorized by an association member as a representative of such
245 member at all reasonable times. The right to inspect the records
246 includes the right to make or obtain copies, at the reasonable
247 expense, if any, of the member and of the person authorized by
248 the association member as a representative of such member. A
249 renter of a unit has a right to inspect and copy only the
250 declaration of condominium, the association's bylaws and rules,
Page 10 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
251 and the inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and
252 718.301(4)(p). The association may adopt reasonable rules
253 regarding the frequency, time, location, notice, and manner of
254 record inspections and copying but may not require a member to
255 demonstrate any purpose or state any reason for the inspection.
256 The failure of an association to provide the records within 10
257 working days after receipt of a written request creates a
258 rebuttable presumption that the association willfully failed to
259 comply with this paragraph. A unit owner who is denied access to
260 official records is entitled to the actual damages or minimum
261 damages for the association's willful failure to comply. Minimum
262 damages are $50 per calendar day for up to 10 days, beginning on
263 the 11th working day after receipt of the written request. The
264 failure to permit inspection entitles any person prevailing in
265 an enforcement action to recover reasonable attorney fees from
266 the person in control of the records who, directly or
267 indirectly, knowingly denied access to the records. If the
268 requested records are posted on an association's website, or are
269 available for download through an application on a mobile
270 device, the association may fulfill its obligations under this
271 paragraph by directing to the website or the application all
272 persons authorized to request access.
273 b. In response to a written request to inspect records,
274 the association must simultaneously provide to the requestor a
275 checklist of all records made available for inspection and
Page 11 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
276 copying. The checklist must also identify any of the
277 association's official records that were not made available to
278 the requestor. An association must maintain a checklist provided
279 under this sub-subparagraph for 7 years. An association
280 delivering a checklist pursuant to this sub-subparagraph creates
281 a rebuttable presumption that the association has complied with
282 this paragraph.
283 2. A director or member of the board or association or a
284 community association manager who willfully and knowingly or
285 intentionally violates subparagraph 1. commits a misdemeanor of
286 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
287 775.083, and must be removed from office and a vacancy declared.
288 3. A person who willfully and knowingly or intentionally
289 defaces or destroys accounting records that are required by this
290 chapter to be maintained during the period for which such
291 records are required to be maintained, or who willfully and
292 knowingly or intentionally fails to create or maintain
293 accounting records that are required to be created or
294 maintained, with the intent of causing harm to the association
295 or one or more of its members, commits a misdemeanor of the
296 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
297 775.083; is personally subject to a civil penalty pursuant to s.
298 718.501(1)(e); and must be removed from office and a vacancy
299 declared.
300 4. A person who willfully and knowingly or intentionally
Page 12 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
301 refuses to release or otherwise produce association records with
302 the intent to avoid or escape detection, arrest, trial, or
303 punishment for the commission of a crime, or to assist another
304 person with such avoidance or escape, commits a felony of the
305 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
306 or s. 775.084, and must be removed from office and a vacancy
307 declared.
308 5. The association shall maintain an adequate number of
309 copies of the declaration, articles of incorporation, bylaws,
310 and rules, and all amendments to each of the foregoing, as well
311 as the question and answer sheet as described in s. 718.504 and
312 the most recent annual financial statement and annual budget
313 required under this section, on the condominium property to
314 ensure their availability to unit owners and prospective
315 purchasers, and may charge its actual costs for preparing and
316 furnishing these documents to those requesting the documents. An
317 association shall allow a member or his or her authorized
318 representative to use a portable device, including a smartphone,
319 tablet, portable scanner, or any other technology capable of
320 scanning or taking photographs, to make an electronic copy of
321 the official records in lieu of the association's providing the
322 member or his or her authorized representative with a copy of
323 such records. The association may not charge a member or his or
324 her authorized representative for the use of a portable device.
325 Notwithstanding this paragraph, the following records are not
Page 13 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
326 accessible to unit owners:
327 a. Any record protected by the lawyer-client privilege as
328 described in s. 90.502 and any record protected by the work-
329 product privilege, including a record prepared by an association
330 attorney or prepared at the attorney's express direction, which
331 reflects a mental impression, conclusion, litigation strategy,
332 or legal theory of the attorney or the association, and which
333 was prepared exclusively for civil or criminal litigation or for
334 adversarial administrative proceedings, or which was prepared in
335 anticipation of such litigation or proceedings until the
336 conclusion of the litigation or proceedings.
337 b. Information obtained by an association in connection
338 with the approval of the lease, sale, or other transfer of a
339 unit.
340 c. Personnel records of association or management company
341 employees, including, but not limited to, disciplinary, payroll,
342 health, and insurance records. For purposes of this sub-
343 subparagraph, the term "personnel records" does not include
344 written employment agreements with an association employee or
345 management company, or budgetary or financial records that
346 indicate the compensation paid to an association employee.
347 d. Medical records of unit owners.
348 e. Social security numbers, driver license numbers, credit
349 card numbers, e-mail addresses, telephone numbers, facsimile
350 numbers, emergency contact information, addresses of a unit
Page 14 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
351 owner other than as provided to fulfill the association's notice
352 requirements, and other personal identifying information of any
353 person, excluding the person's name, unit designation, mailing
354 address, property address, and any address, e-mail address, or
355 facsimile number provided to the association to fulfill the
356 association's notice requirements. Notwithstanding the
357 restrictions in this sub-subparagraph, an association may print
358 and distribute to unit owners a directory containing the name,
359 unit address, and all telephone numbers of each unit owner.
360 However, an owner may exclude his or her telephone numbers from
361 the directory by so requesting in writing to the association. An
362 owner may consent in writing to the disclosure of other contact
363 information described in this sub-subparagraph. The association
364 is not liable for the inadvertent disclosure of information that
365 is protected under this sub-subparagraph if the information is
366 included in an official record of the association and is
367 voluntarily provided by an owner and not requested by the
368 association.
369 f. Electronic security measures that are used by the
370 association to safeguard data, including passwords.
371 g. The software and operating system used by the
372 association which allow the manipulation of data, even if the
373 owner owns a copy of the same software used by the association.
374 The data is part of the official records of the association.
375 h. All affirmative acknowledgments made pursuant to s.
Page 15 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
376 718.121(4)(c).
377 6.a. If an association receives a subpoena or written
378 request for records from a prosecuting agency as defined in s.
379 112.531 or a law enforcement agency, the association must
380 provide a copy of such records or otherwise make the records
381 available for inspection and copying to the prosecuting agency
382 or law enforcement agency within 5 business days after receipt
383 of the subpoena or written request, unless otherwise specified
384 by the law enforcement agency, prosecuting agency, subpoena, or
385 written request. An association must assist a law enforcement
386 agency and a prosecting agency in an investigation to the extent
387 permissible by law.
388 b. A director or member of the board or association or a
389 community association manager who willfully and knowingly fails
390 to provide a copy of records, or otherwise fails to make the
391 records available for inspection and copying, to a prosecuting
392 agency or a law enforcement agency as required under sub-
393 subparagraph a. commits a misdemeanor of the second degree,
394 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
395 Section 5. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
396 718.112, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
397 718.112 Bylaws.—
398 (2) REQUIRED PROVISIONS.—The bylaws shall provide for the
399 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include
400 the following:
Page 16 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
401 (g) Structural integrity reserve study.—
402 1. A residential condominium association must have a
403 structural integrity reserve study completed at least every 10
404 years after the condominium's creation for each building on the
405 condominium property that is three habitable stories or higher
406 in height, as determined by the Florida Building Code, which
407 includes, at a minimum, a study of the following items as
408 related to the structural integrity and safety of the building:
409 a. Roof.
410 b. Structure, including load-bearing walls and other
411 primary structural members and primary structural systems as
412 those terms are defined in s. 627.706.
413 c. Fireproofing and fire protection systems.
414 d. Plumbing.
415 e. Electrical systems.
416 f. Waterproofing and exterior painting.
417 g. Windows and exterior doors.
418 h. Any other item that has a deferred maintenance expense
419 or replacement cost that exceeds $25,000 or the inflation-
420 adjusted amount determined by the division under subparagraph
421 (f)6., whichever is greater, and the failure to replace or
422 maintain such item negatively affects the items listed in sub-
423 subparagraphs a.-g., as determined by the visual inspection
424 portion of the structural integrity reserve study.
425 2. A structural integrity reserve study is based on a
Page 17 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
426 visual inspection of the condominium property.
427 3.a. A structural integrity reserve study, including the
428 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve
429 study, must be performed or verified by an engineer licensed
430 under chapter 471, an architect licensed under chapter 481, or a
431 person certified as a reserve specialist or professional reserve
432 analyst by the Community Associations Institute or the
433 Association of Professional Reserve Analysts.
434 b. Any design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or any
435 contractor licensed under chapter 489 who bids to perform a
436 structural integrity reserve study must disclose in writing to
437 the association his or her intent to bid on any services related
438 to any maintenance, repair, or replacement that may be
439 recommended by the structural integrity reserve study. Any
440 design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or contractor
441 licensed under chapter 489 who submits a bid to the association
442 for performing any services recommended by the structural
443 integrity reserve study may not have an interest, directly or
444 indirectly, in the firm or entity providing the association's
445 structural integrity reserve study or be a relative of any
446 person having a direct or indirect interest in such firm, unless
447 such relationship is disclosed to the association in writing. As
448 used in this section, the term "relative" means a relative
449 within the third degree of consanguinity by blood or marriage. A
450 contract for services is voidable and terminates upon the
Page 18 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
451 association filing a written notice terminating the contract if
452 the design professional or licensed contractor failed to provide
453 the written disclosure of the interests or relationships
454 required under this paragraph. A design professional or licensed
455 contractor may be subject to discipline under the applicable
456 practice act for his or her profession for failure to provide
457 the written disclosure of the interests or relationships
458 required under this paragraph.
459 4.a. At a minimum, a structural integrity reserve study
460 must identify each item of the condominium property being
461 visually inspected, state the estimated remaining useful life
462 and the estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance
463 expense of each item of the condominium property being visually
464 inspected, and provide a reserve funding plan or schedule with a
465 recommended annual reserve amount that achieves the estimated
466 replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of each item of
467 condominium property being visually inspected by the end of the
468 estimated remaining useful life of the item. At a minimum, the
469 structural integrity reserve study must include a recommendation
470 for a reserve funding schedule based on a baseline funding plan
471 that provides a reserve funding goal in which the reserve
472 funding for each budget year is sufficient to maintain the
473 reserve cash balance above zero. The study may recommend other
474 types of reserve funding schedules, provided that each
475 recommended schedule is sufficient to meet the association's
Page 19 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
476 maintenance obligation.
477 b. The structural integrity reserve study may recommend
478 that reserves do not need to be maintained for any item for
479 which an estimate of useful life and an estimate of replacement
480 cost cannot be determined, or the study may recommend a deferred
481 maintenance expense amount for such item. The structural
482 integrity reserve study may recommend that reserves for
483 replacement costs do not need to be maintained for any item with
484 an estimated remaining useful life of greater than 25 years, but
485 the study may recommend a deferred maintenance expense amount
486 for such item. If the structural integrity reserve study
487 recommends reserves for any item for which reserves are not
488 required under this paragraph, the amount of the recommended
489 reserves for such item must be separately identified in the
490 structural integrity reserve study as an item for which reserves
491 are not required under this paragraph.
492 c. The structural integrity reserve study must take into
493 consideration the funding method or methods used by the
494 association to fund its maintenance and reserve funding
495 obligations through regular assessments, special assessments,
496 lines of credit, or loans. If the structural integrity reserve
497 study is performed before the association has approved a special
498 assessment or secured a line of credit or a loan, the structural
499 integrity reserve study must be updated to reflect the funding
500 method selected by the association and its effect on the reserve
Page 20 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
501 funding schedule, including any anticipated change in the amount
502 of regular assessments. The structural integrity reserve study
503 may be updated to reflect any changes to the useful life of the
504 reserve items after such items are repaired or replaced and the
505 effect such repair or replacement will have on the reserve
506 funding schedule. The association must obtain an updated
507 structural integrity reserve study before adopting any budget in
508 which the reserve funding from regular assessments, special
509 assessments, lines of credit, or loans does not align with the
510 funding plan from the most recent version of the structural
511 integrity reserve study.
512 5. This paragraph does not apply to buildings less than
513 three habitable stories in height; single-family, two-family,
514 three-family, or four-family dwellings with three or fewer
515 habitable stories above ground; any portion or component of a
516 building that has not been submitted to the condominium form of
517 ownership; or any portion or component of a building that is
518 maintained by a party other than the association.
519 6. Before a developer turns over control of an association
520 to unit owners other than the developer, the developer must have
521 a turnover inspection report in compliance with s. 718.301(4)(p)
522 and (q) for each building on the condominium property that is
523 three stories or higher in height.
524 7. Associations existing on or before July 1, 2022, which
525 are controlled by unit owners other than the developer, must
Page 21 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
526 have a structural integrity reserve study completed by December
527 31, 2025, for each building on the condominium property that is
528 three habitable stories or higher in height. An association that
529 is required to complete a milestone inspection in accordance
530 with s. 553.899 on or before December 31, 2026, may complete the
531 structural integrity reserve study simultaneously with the
532 milestone inspection. In no event may the structural integrity
533 reserve study be completed after December 31, 2026.
534 8. If the milestone inspection required by s. 553.899, or
535 an inspection completed for a similar local requirement, was
536 performed within the past 5 years and meets the requirements of
537 this paragraph, such inspection may be used in place of the
538 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve
539 study.
540 9. If the association completes a milestone inspection
541 required by s. 553.899, or an inspection completed for a similar
542 local requirement, the association may delay performance of a
543 required structural integrity reserve study for no more than the
544 2 consecutive budget years immediately following the milestone
545 inspection in order to allow the association to focus its
546 financial resources on completing the repair and maintenance
547 recommendations of the milestone inspection.
548 10. If the officers or directors of an association
549 willfully and knowingly fail to complete a structural integrity
550 reserve study pursuant to this paragraph, such failure is a
Page 22 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
551 breach of an officer's or a director's fiduciary relationship to
552 the unit owners under s. 718.111(1). An officer or a director of
553 an association must sign an affidavit acknowledging receipt of
554 the completed structural integrity reserve study.
555 11. Within 45 days after receiving the structural
556 integrity reserve study, the association must distribute a copy
557 of the study to each unit owner or deliver to each unit owner a
558 notice that the completed study is available for inspection and
559 copying upon a written request. Distribution of a copy of the
560 study or notice must be made by United States mail or personal
561 delivery to the mailing address, property address, or any other
562 address of the owner provided to fulfill the association's
563 notice requirements under this chapter, or by electronic
564 transmission to the e-mail address or facsimile number provided
565 to fulfill the association's notice requirements to unit owners
566 who previously consented to receive notice by electronic
567 transmission.
568 12. Within 45 days after receiving the structural
569 integrity reserve study, the association must provide the
570 division with a statement indicating that the study was
571 completed and that the association provided or made available
572 such study to each unit owner in accordance with this section.
573 The statement must be provided to the division in the manner
574 established by the division using a form posted on the
575 division's website.
Page 23 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
576 13. The division shall adopt by rule the form for the
577 structural integrity reserve study in coordination with the
578 Florida Building Commission.
579 Section 6. Subsections (6) and (7) of section 718.1255,
580 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) and (6),
581 respectively, and paragraphs (a), (h), (k), and (m) of
582 subsection (4) and present subsection (5) of that section are
583 amended, to read:
584 718.1255 Alternative dispute resolution; mediation;
585 nonbinding arbitration; applicability.—
586 (4) NONBINDING ARBITRATION AND MEDIATION OF DISPUTES.—The
587 Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes
588 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation may
589 employ full-time attorneys to act as arbitrators to conduct the
590 arbitration hearings provided by this chapter. The division may
591 also certify attorneys who are not employed by the division to
592 act as arbitrators to conduct the arbitration hearings provided
593 by this chapter. A person may not be employed by the department
594 as a full-time arbitrator unless he or she is a member in good
595 standing of The Florida Bar. A person may only be certified by
596 the division to act as an arbitrator if he or she has been a
597 member in good standing of The Florida Bar for at least 5 years
598 and has mediated or arbitrated at least 10 disputes involving
599 condominiums in this state during the 3 years immediately
600 preceding the date of application, mediated or arbitrated at
Page 24 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
601 least 30 disputes in any subject area in this state during the 3
602 years immediately preceding the date of application, or attained
603 board certification in real estate law or condominium and
604 planned development law from The Florida Bar. Arbitrator
605 certification is valid for 1 year. An arbitrator who does not
606 maintain the minimum qualifications for initial certification
607 may not have his or her certification renewed. The department
608 may not enter into a legal services contract for an arbitration
609 hearing under this chapter with an attorney who is not a
610 certified arbitrator unless a certified arbitrator is not
611 available within 50 miles of the dispute. The department shall
612 adopt rules of procedure to govern such arbitration hearings
613 including mediation incident thereto. The decision of an
614 arbitrator is final; however, a decision is not deemed final
615 agency action. Nothing in this provision shall be construed to
616 foreclose parties from proceeding in a trial de novo unless the
617 parties have agreed that the arbitration is binding. If judicial
618 proceedings are initiated, the final decision of the arbitrator
619 is admissible in evidence in the trial de novo.
620 (a) Before the institution of court litigation, a party to
621 a dispute, other than an election or recall dispute, must shall
622 either petition the division for nonbinding arbitration or
623 request that the case be referred to mediation initiate presuit
624 mediation as provided in subsection (5). Arbitration is binding
625 on the parties if all parties in arbitration agree to be bound
Page 25 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
626 in a writing filed in arbitration. The petition must be
627 accompanied by a filing fee in the amount of $50. Filing fees
628 collected under this section must be used to defray the expenses
629 of the alternative dispute resolution program.
630 (h) Mediation proceedings must generally be conducted in
631 accordance with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, and these
632 proceedings are privileged and confidential to the same extent
633 as court-ordered mediation. Persons who are not parties to the
634 dispute are not allowed to attend the mediation conference
635 without the consent of all parties, with the exception of
636 counsel for the parties and corporate representatives designated
637 to appear for a party. If the mediator declares an impasse after
638 a mediation conference has been held, the arbitration proceeding
639 terminates, unless all parties agree in writing to continue the
640 arbitration proceeding, in which case the arbitrator's decision
641 shall be binding or nonbinding, as agreed upon by the parties;
642 in the arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator shall not consider
643 any evidence relating to the unsuccessful mediation except in a
644 proceeding to impose sanctions for failure to appear at the
645 mediation conference. If the parties do not agree to continue
646 arbitration, the arbitrator shall enter an order of dismissal,
647 and either party may institute a suit in a community association
648 court program under s. 720.32 or a court of competent
649 jurisdiction. The parties may seek to recover any costs and
650 attorney fees incurred in connection with arbitration and
Page 26 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
651 mediation proceedings under this section as part of the costs
652 and fees that may be recovered by the prevailing party in any
653 subsequent litigation.
654 (k) The arbitration decision shall be rendered within 30
655 days after the hearing and presented to the parties in writing.
656 An arbitration decision is final in those disputes in which the
657 parties have agreed to be bound. An arbitration decision is also
658 final if a complaint for a trial de novo is not filed in a
659 community association court program under s. 720.32 or a court
660 of competent jurisdiction in which the condominium is located
661 within 30 days. The right to file for a trial de novo entitles
662 the parties to file a complaint in the appropriate trial court
663 for a judicial resolution of the dispute. The prevailing party
664 in an arbitration proceeding shall be awarded the costs of the
665 arbitration and reasonable attorney fees in an amount determined
666 by the arbitrator. Such an award shall include the costs and
667 reasonable attorney fees incurred in the arbitration proceeding
668 as well as the costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in
669 preparing for and attending any scheduled mediation. An
670 arbitrator's failure to render a written decision within 30 days
671 after the hearing may result in the cancellation of his or her
672 arbitration certification.
673 (m) Any party to an arbitration proceeding may enforce an
674 arbitration award by filing a petition in a community
675 association court program under s. 720.32 or a court of
Page 27 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
676 competent jurisdiction in which the condominium is located. A
677 petition may not be granted unless the time for appeal by the
678 filing of a complaint for trial de novo has expired. If a
679 complaint for a trial de novo has been filed, a petition may not
680 be granted with respect to an arbitration award that has been
681 stayed. If the petition for enforcement is granted, the
682 petitioner shall recover reasonable attorney fees and costs
683 incurred in enforcing the arbitration award. A mediation
684 settlement may also be enforced through the county or circuit
685 court or a community association court program, as applicable,
686 and any costs and fees incurred in the enforcement of a
687 settlement agreement reached at mediation must be awarded to the
688 prevailing party in any enforcement action.
689 (5) PRESUIT MEDIATION.—In lieu of the initiation of
690 nonbinding arbitration as provided in subsections (1)-(4), a
691 party may submit a dispute to presuit mediation in accordance
692 with s. 720.311; however, election and recall disputes are not
693 eligible for mediation and such disputes must be arbitrated by
694 the division or filed in a court of competent jurisdiction.
695 Section 7. Subsection (7) of section 718.128, Florida
696 Statutes, is amended to read:
697 718.128 Electronic voting.—The association may conduct
698 elections and other unit owner votes through an Internet-based
699 online voting system if a unit owner consents, electronically or
700 in writing, to online voting and if the following requirements
Page 28 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
701 are met:
702 (7)(a) Unless the association has adopted electronic
703 voting in accordance with subsections (1)-(6), the association
704 must designate an e-mail address, independent website,
705 application, or Internet web portal for receipt of
706 electronically transmitted ballots. Electronically transmitted
707 ballots must meet all the requirements of this subsection.
708 (b) A unit owner may electronically transmit a ballot to
709 the e-mail address, independent website, application, or
710 Internet web portal designated by the association without
711 complying with s. 718.112(2)(d)3. s. 718.112(2)(d)4. or the
712 rules providing for the secrecy of ballots adopted by the
713 division. The association must count completed ballots that are
714 electronically transmitted to the designated e-mail address,
715 independent website, application, or Internet web portal,
716 provided the completed ballots comply with the requirements of
717 this subsection.
718 (c) A ballot that is electronically transmitted to the
719 association must include all of the following:
720 1. A space for the unit owner to type in his or her unit
721 number.
722 2. A space for the unit owner to type in his or her first
723 and last name, which also functions as the signature of the unit
724 owner for purposes of signing the ballot.
725 3. The following statement in capitalized letters and in a
Page 29 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
726 font size larger than any other font size used in the electronic
727 transmission e-mail from the association to the unit owner:
728
729 WAIVING THE SECRECY OF YOUR BALLOT IS YOUR CHOICE. YOU
730 DO NOT HAVE TO WAIVE THE SECRECY OF YOUR BALLOT IN
731 ORDER TO VOTE. BY TRANSMITTING YOUR COMPLETED BALLOT
732 THROUGH ELECTRONIC MEANS E-MAIL TO THE ASSOCIATION,
733 YOU WAIVE THE SECRECY OF YOUR COMPLETED BALLOT. IF YOU
734 DO NOT WISH TO WAIVE YOUR SECRECY BUT WISH TO
735 PARTICIPATE IN THE VOTE THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THIS
736 BALLOT, PLEASE ATTEND THE IN-PERSON MEETING DURING
737 WHICH THE MATTER WILL BE VOTED ON.
738
739 (d) A unit owner must transmit his or her completed ballot
740 to the e-mail address, independent website, application, or
741 Internet web portal designated by the association no later than
742 the scheduled date and time of the meeting during which the
743 matter is being voted on.
744 (e) There is a rebuttable presumption that an association
745 has reviewed all folders associated with the e-mail address,
746 independent website, application, or Internet web portal
747 designated by the association to receive ballots if a board
748 member, an officer, or an agent of the association, or a manager
749 licensed under part VIII of chapter 468, provides a sworn
750 affidavit attesting to such review.
Page 30 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
751 Section 8. Subsections (19) through (29) of section
752 719.103, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (20)
753 through (30), respectively, and a new subsection (19) is added
754 to that section to read:
755 719.103 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
756 (19) "Habitable" means a space in a building for living,
757 sleeping, eating, or cooking. Garages, carports, and storage or
758 utility spaces are not considered habitable.
759 Section 9. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
760 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
761 719.106 Bylaws; cooperative ownership.—
762 (1) MANDATORY PROVISIONS.—The bylaws or other cooperative
763 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not,
764 they shall be deemed to include the following:
765 (k) Structural integrity reserve study.—
766 1. A residential cooperative association must have a
767 structural integrity reserve study completed at least every 10
768 years for each building on the cooperative property that is
769 three habitable stories or higher in height, as determined by
770 the Florida Building Code, that includes, at a minimum, a study
771 of the following items as related to the structural integrity
772 and safety of the building:
773 a. Roof.
774 b. Structure, including load-bearing walls and other
775 primary structural members and primary structural systems as
Page 31 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
776 those terms are defined in s. 627.706.
777 c. Fireproofing and fire protection systems.
778 d. Plumbing.
779 e. Electrical systems.
780 f. Waterproofing and exterior painting.
781 g. Windows and exterior doors.
782 h. Any other item that has a deferred maintenance expense
783 or replacement cost that exceeds $25,000 or the inflation-
784 adjusted amount determined by the division under subparagraph
785 (j)6., whichever is greater, and the failure to replace or
786 maintain such item negatively affects the items listed in sub-
787 subparagraphs a.-g., as determined by the visual inspection
788 portion of the structural integrity reserve study.
789 2. A structural integrity reserve study is based on a
790 visual inspection of the cooperative property.
791 3.a. A structural integrity reserve study, including the
792 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve
793 study, must be performed or verified by an engineer licensed
794 under chapter 471, an architect licensed under chapter 481, or a
795 person certified as a reserve specialist or professional reserve
796 analyst by the Community Associations Institute or the
797 Association of Professional Reserve Analysts.
798 b. Any design professional as defined in s. 558.002(7) or
799 contractor licensed under chapter 489 who bids to perform a
800 structural integrity reserve study must disclose in writing to
Page 32 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
801 the association his or her intent to bid on any services related
802 to any maintenance, repair, or replacement that may be
803 recommended by the structural integrity reserve study. Any
804 design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or contractor
805 licensed under chapter 489 who submits a bid to the association
806 for performing any services recommended by the structural
807 integrity reserve study may not have an interest, directly or
808 indirectly, in the firm or entity providing the association's
809 structural integrity reserve study or be a relative of any
810 person having a direct or indirect interest in such firm, unless
811 such relationship is disclosed to the association in writing. As
812 used in this section, the term "relative" means a relative
813 within the third degree of consanguinity by blood or marriage. A
814 contract for services is voidable and terminates upon the
815 association filing a written notice terminating the contract if
816 the design professional or licensed contractor failed to provide
817 the written disclosure of the relationship required under this
818 paragraph. A design professional or licensed contractor may be
819 subject to discipline under the applicable practice act for his
820 or her profession for failure to provide the written disclosure
821 of the relationship required under this subparagraph.
822 4.a. At a minimum, a structural integrity reserve study
823 must identify each item of the cooperative property being
824 visually inspected, state the estimated remaining useful life
825 and the estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance
Page 33 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
826 expense of each item of the cooperative property being visually
827 inspected, and provide a reserve funding schedule with a
828 recommended annual reserve amount that achieves the estimated
829 replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of each item of
830 cooperative property being visually inspected by the end of the
831 estimated remaining useful life of the item. The structural
832 integrity reserve study may recommend that reserves do not need
833 to be maintained for any item for which an estimate of useful
834 life and an estimate of replacement cost cannot be determined,
835 or the study may recommend a deferred maintenance expense amount
836 for such item. At a minimum, the structural integrity reserve
837 study must include a recommendation for a reserve funding
838 schedule based on a baseline funding plan that provides a
839 reserve funding goal in which the reserve funding for each
840 budget year is sufficient to maintain the reserve cash balance
841 above zero. The study may recommend other types of reserve
842 funding schedules, provided that each recommended schedule is
843 sufficient to meet the association's maintenance obligation.
844 b. The structural integrity reserve study may recommend
845 that reserves for replacement costs do not need to be maintained
846 for any item with an estimated remaining useful life of greater
847 than 25 years, but the study may recommend a deferred
848 maintenance expense amount for such item. If the structural
849 integrity reserve study recommends reserves for any item for
850 which reserves are not required under this paragraph, the amount
Page 34 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
851 of the recommended reserves for such item must be separately
852 identified in the structural integrity reserve study as an item
853 for which reserves are not required under this paragraph.
854 c. The structural integrity reserve study must take into
855 consideration the funding method or methods used by the
856 association to fund its maintenance and reserve funding
857 obligations through regular assessments, special assessments,
858 lines of credit, or loans. If the structural integrity reserve
859 study is performed before the association has approved a special
860 assessment or secured a line of credit or a loan, the structural
861 integrity reserve study must be updated to reflect the funding
862 method selected by the association and its effect on the reserve
863 funding schedule, including any anticipated change in the amount
864 of regular assessments. The structural integrity reserve study
865 may be updated to reflect any changes to the useful life of the
866 reserve items after such items are repaired or replaced, and the
867 effect such repair or replacement will have on the reserve
868 funding schedule. The association must obtain an updated
869 structural integrity reserve study before adopting any budget in
870 which the reserve funding from regular assessments, special
871 assessments, lines of credit, or loans does not align with the
872 funding plan from the most recent version of the structural
873 integrity reserve study.
874 5. This paragraph does not apply to buildings less than
875 three habitable stories in height; single-family, two-family,
Page 35 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
876 three-family, or four-family dwellings with three or fewer
877 habitable stories above ground; any portion or component of a
878 building that has not been submitted to the cooperative form of
879 ownership; or any portion or component of a building that is
880 maintained by a party other than the association.
881 6. Before a developer turns over control of an association
882 to unit owners other than the developer, the developer must have
883 a turnover inspection report in compliance with s. 719.301(4)(p)
884 and (q) for each building on the cooperative property that is
885 three stories or higher in height.
886 7. Associations existing on or before July 1, 2022, which
887 are controlled by unit owners other than the developer, must
888 have a structural integrity reserve study completed by December
889 31, 2024, for each building on the cooperative property that is
890 three habitable stories or higher in height. An association that
891 is required to complete a milestone inspection on or before
892 December 31, 2026, in accordance with s. 553.899 may complete
893 the structural integrity reserve study simultaneously with the
894 milestone inspection. In no event may the structural integrity
895 reserve study be completed after December 31, 2026.
896 8. If the milestone inspection required by s. 553.899, or
897 an inspection completed for a similar local requirement, was
898 performed within the past 5 years and meets the requirements of
899 this paragraph, such inspection may be used in place of the
900 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve
Page 36 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
901 study.
902 9. If the association completes a milestone inspection
903 required by s. 553.899, or an inspection completed for a similar
904 local requirement, the association may delay performance of a
905 required structural integrity reserve study for no more than the
906 2 consecutive budget years immediately following the milestone
907 inspection in order to allow the association to focus its
908 financial resources on completing the repair and maintenance
909 recommendations of the milestone inspection.
910 10. If the officers or directors of an association
911 willfully and knowingly fail to complete a structural integrity
912 reserve study pursuant to this paragraph, such failure is a
913 breach of an officer's and director's fiduciary relationship to
914 the unit owners under s. 719.104(9). An officer or a director of
915 the association must sign an affidavit acknowledging receipt of
916 the completed structural integrity reserve study.
917 11. Within 45 days after receiving the structural
918 integrity reserve study, the association must distribute a copy
919 of the study to each unit owner or deliver to each unit owner a
920 notice that the completed study is available for inspection and
921 copying upon a written request. Distribution of a copy of the
922 study or notice must be made by United States mail or personal
923 delivery at the mailing address, property address, or any other
924 address of the owner provided to fulfill the association's
925 notice requirements under this chapter, or by electronic
Page 37 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
926 transmission to the e-mail address or facsimile number provided
927 to fulfill the association's notice requirements to unit owners
928 who previously consented to receive notice by electronic
929 transmission.
930 12. Within 45 days after receiving the structural
931 integrity reserve study, the association must provide the
932 division with a statement indicating that the study was
933 completed and that the association provided or made available
934 such study to each unit owner in accordance with this section.
935 Such statement must be provided to the division in the manner
936 established by the division using a form posted on the
937 division's website.
938 13. The division shall adopt by rule the form for the
939 structural integrity reserve study in coordination with the
940 Florida Building Commission.
941 Section 10. Subsections (8) through (13) of section
942 720.301, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (9)
943 through (14), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to
944 that section, to read:
945 720.301 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
946 (8) "Financial statements" means a comprehensive report
947 prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
948 principles which accurately reflects the financial condition and
949 operation of a homeowners' association for a specified reporting
950 period. This report must include, at a minimum, a balance sheet;
Page 38 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
951 an income and expense statement; a budget comparison; and a
952 complete set of bank statements, including copies of check
953 images for all disbursements the association made during the
954 reporting period, for each bank account belonging to the
955 association.
956 Section 11. Subsection (2) of section 720.302, Florida
957 Statutes, is amended to read:
958 720.302 Purposes, scope, and application.—
959 (2) The Legislature recognizes that it is not in the best
960 interest of homeowners' associations or the individual
961 association members thereof to create or impose a bureau or
962 other agency of state government to regulate the affairs of
963 homeowners' associations. However, in accordance with s.
964 720.311, the Legislature finds that homeowners' associations and
965 their individual members will benefit from an expedited
966 alternative process for resolution of election and recall
967 disputes and presuit mediation of other disputes involving
968 covenant enforcement and authorizes the department to hear,
969 administer, and determine these disputes as more fully set forth
970 in this chapter. Further, the Legislature recognizes that
971 certain contract rights have been created for the benefit of
972 homeowners' associations and members thereof before the
973 effective date of this act and that ss. 720.301-720.407 are not
974 intended to impair such contract rights, including, but not
975 limited to, the rights of the developer to complete the
Page 39 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
976 community as initially contemplated.
977 Section 12. Subsections (11) through (15) of section
978 720.303, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (12)
979 through (16), respectively, subsection (1) and paragraph (i) of
980 subsection (5) are amended, and a new subsection (11) is added
981 to that section, to read:
982 720.303 Association powers and duties; meetings of board;
983 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association
984 funds; recalls.—
985 (1) POWERS AND DUTIES.—
986 (a) An association that operates a community as defined in
987 s. 720.301 must be operated by an association that is a Florida
988 corporation. After October 1, 1995, the association must be
989 incorporated and the initial governing documents must be
990 recorded in the official records of the county in which the
991 community is located. An association may operate more than one
992 community.
993 (b) The officers and directors of an association are
994 subject to s. 617.0830 and have a fiduciary relationship to the
995 members who are served by the association.
996 (c) The powers and duties of an association include those
997 set forth in this chapter and, except as expressly limited or
998 restricted in this chapter, those set forth in the governing
999 documents.
1000 1. Each association formed on or after July 1, 2026, must
Page 40 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1001 include the following statement in the governing documents:
1002
1003 This association and the association's governing
1004 documents are governed by the Florida Homeowners'
1005 Association Act, as amended from time to time.
1006
1007 2. By January 1, 2027, each association in existence
1008 before July 1, 2026, must hold a meeting of the members in
1009 accordance with s. 720.306 to vote whether to amend the
1010 governing documents of the association to include the statement
1011 in subparagraph 1. The association must obtain the affirmative
1012 approval of two-thirds of the voting interests of the
1013 association at a meeting of the membership at which a quorum has
1014 been attained in order to amend the governing documents under
1015 this subparagraph.
1016 (d) After control of the association is obtained by
1017 members other than the developer, the association may institute,
1018 maintain, settle, or appeal actions or hearings in its name on
1019 behalf of all members concerning matters of common interest to
1020 the members, including, but not limited to, the common areas;
1021 roof or structural components of a building, or other
1022 improvements for which the association is responsible;
1023 mechanical, electrical, or plumbing elements serving an
1024 improvement or building for which the association is
1025 responsible; representations of the developer pertaining to any
Page 41 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1026 existing or proposed commonly used facility; and protest of ad
1027 valorem taxes on commonly used facilities. The association may
1028 defend actions in eminent domain or bring inverse condemnation
1029 actions. Before commencing litigation against any party in the
1030 name of the association involving amounts in controversy in
1031 excess of $100,000, the association must obtain the affirmative
1032 approval of a majority of the voting interests at a meeting of
1033 the membership at which a quorum has been attained. This
1034 paragraph subsection does not limit any statutory or common-law
1035 right of any individual member or class of members to bring any
1036 action without participation by the association.
1037 (e) A member does not have authority to act for the
1038 association by virtue of being a member. An association may have
1039 more than one class of members and may issue membership
1040 certificates.
1041 (f) An association of 15 or fewer parcel owners may
1042 enforce only the requirements of those deed restrictions
1043 established prior to the purchase of each parcel upon an
1044 affected parcel owner or owners.
1045 (5) INSPECTION AND COPYING OF RECORDS.—
1046 (i)1. If an association receives a subpoena or written
1047 request for records from a prosecuting agency as defined in s.
1048 112.531 or a law enforcement agency, the association must
1049 provide a copy of such records or otherwise make the records
1050 available for inspection and copying to a law enforcement agency
Page 42 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1051 or prosecuting agency within 5 business days after receipt of
1052 the subpoena or written request, unless otherwise specified by
1053 the law enforcement agency, prosecuting agency, or subpoena, or
1054 written request. An association must assist a law enforcement
1055 agency in its investigation to the extent permissible by law.
1056 2. A director or member of the board or association or a
1057 community association manager who willfully and knowingly fails
1058 to provide a copy of records, or otherwise fails to make the
1059 records available for inspection and copying, to a law
1060 enforcement agency or prosecuting agency as required under
1061 subparagraph 1. commits a misdemeanor of the second degree,
1062 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1063 (11) CONFLICTS OF INTEREST.—
1064 (a) A director, an officer, or a committee member of an
1065 association owes a duty of loyalty to the association and its
1066 members.
1067 (b) A conflict of interest exists when a director, an
1068 officer, or a committee member has a direct or an indirect
1069 financial interest in a transaction, contract, or decision under
1070 consideration by the association.
1071 (c) The director, officer, or committee member with a
1072 conflict of interest must disclose the nature and extent of the
1073 conflict in writing to the board before any discussion or vote
1074 occurs on the matter.
1075 (d) After disclosure of the conflict of interest, the
Page 43 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1076 conflicted director, officer, or committee member may not
1077 participate in any discussion or vote on the matter.
1078 (e) A transaction involving a conflict of interest is
1079 voidable by the association unless the transaction was approved
1080 by a majority of the voting interests of the association after
1081 full disclosure by the conflicted director, officer, or
1082 committee member has occurred.
1083 (f) Compensating or contracting with a director, an
1084 officer, or a committee member of the association, or an
1085 immediate family member thereof, creates a rebuttable
1086 presumption that a conflict of interest exists.
1087 (g) This subsection may not be waived or limited by the
1088 governing documents of the association.
1089 Section 13. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1090 720.3035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1091 720.3035 Architectural control covenants; parcel owner
1092 improvements; rights and privileges.—
1093 (1)
1094 (b) An association or any architectural, construction
1095 improvement, or other such similar committee of an association
1096 may not enforce or adopt a covenant, rule, or guideline that:
1097 1. Limits or places requirements on the interior of a
1098 structure that is not visible from the parcel's frontage or an
1099 adjacent parcel, an adjacent common area, or a community golf
1100 course.
Page 44 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1101 2. Requires the review and approval of plans and
1102 specifications for a central air-conditioning, refrigeration,
1103 heating, or ventilating system by the association or any
1104 architectural, construction improvement, or other such similar
1105 committee of an association, if such system is not visible from
1106 the parcel's frontage, an adjacent parcel, an adjacent common
1107 area, or a community golf course and is substantially similar to
1108 a system that is approved or recommended by the association or a
1109 committee thereof.
1110 3. Requires that a specific type of material be used on
1111 the building or rebuilding of a roof, provided the built or
1112 rebuilt roof appears to be substantially identical in shape and
1113 color to the roofing requirements created by the association or
1114 any architectural, construction improvement, or other similar
1115 committee of the association and that such roofing materials
1116 adhere to the roof systems recognized by the Florida Building
1117 Code which meet ASCE 7-22 standards pursuant to paragraph
1118 (6)(c).
1119 Section 14. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
1120 720.306, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1121 720.306 Meetings of members; voting and election
1122 procedures; amendments.—
1123 (1) QUORUM; AMENDMENTS.—
1124 (h)1. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, any
1125 governing document, or amendment to a governing document, that
Page 45 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1126 is enacted after July 1, 2021, and that prohibits or regulates
1127 rental agreements applies only to a parcel owner who acquires
1128 title to the parcel after the effective date of the governing
1129 document or amendment, or to a parcel owner who consents,
1130 individually or through a representative, to the governing
1131 document or amendment.
1132 2. Notwithstanding subparagraph 1., an association may
1133 amend its governing documents to prohibit or regulate rental
1134 agreements for a term of less than 6 months and may prohibit the
1135 rental of a parcel for more than three times in a calendar year,
1136 and such amendments shall apply to all parcel owners.
1137 3. This paragraph does not affect the amendment
1138 restrictions for associations of 15 or fewer parcel owners under
1139 s. 720.303(1)(f) s. 720.303(1).
1140 4. For purposes of this paragraph, a change of ownership
1141 does not occur when a parcel owner conveys the parcel to an
1142 affiliated entity, when beneficial ownership of the parcel does
1143 not change, or when an heir becomes the parcel owner. For
1144 purposes of this subparagraph, the term "affiliated entity"
1145 means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under
1146 common control with the parcel owner or that becomes a parent or
1147 successor entity by reason of transfer, merger, consolidation,
1148 public offering, reorganization, dissolution or sale of stock,
1149 or transfer of membership partnership interests. For a
1150 conveyance to be recognized as one made to an affiliated entity,
Page 46 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1151 the entity must furnish to the association a document certifying
1152 that this subparagraph applies and provide any organizational
1153 documents for the parcel owner and the affiliated entity which
1154 support the representations in the certificate, as requested by
1155 the association.
1156 5. For purposes of this paragraph, a change of ownership
1157 does occur when, with respect to a parcel owner that is a
1158 business entity, every person that owned an interest in the real
1159 property at the time of the enactment of the amendment or rule
1160 conveys their interest in the real property to an unaffiliated
1161 entity.
1162 Section 15. Paragraph (g) is added to subsection (3) of
1163 section 720.3075, Florida Statutes, to read:
1164 720.3075 Prohibited clauses in association documents.—
1165 (3) Homeowners' association documents, including
1166 declarations of covenants, articles of incorporation, or bylaws,
1167 may not preclude:
1168 (g) A property owner from using any type of building
1169 material to build or rebuild his or her roof, provided the built
1170 or rebuilt roof appears to be substantially identical in shape
1171 and color to the roofing requirements created by the association
1172 or any architectural, construction improvement, or other similar
1173 committee of the association and that such roofing materials
1174 adhere to the roof systems recognized by the Florida Building
1175 Code which meet ASCE 7-22 standards pursuant to paragraph
Page 47 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1176 (6)(c).
1177 Section 16. Section 720.311, Florida Statutes, is amended
1178 to read:
1179 720.311 Dispute resolution.—
1180 (1) The Legislature finds that alternative dispute
1181 resolution has made progress in reducing court dockets and
1182 trials and in offering a more efficient, cost-effective option
1183 to litigation. The filing of any petition for arbitration tolls
1184 or the serving of a demand for presuit mediation as provided for
1185 in this section shall toll the applicable statute of
1186 limitations. Any recall dispute filed with the department under
1187 s. 720.303(10) must shall be conducted by the department in
1188 accordance with the provisions of ss. 718.112(2)(l) and 718.1255
1189 and the rules adopted by the division. In addition, the
1190 department shall conduct binding arbitration of election
1191 disputes between a member and an association in accordance with
1192 s. 718.1255 and rules adopted by the division. Election disputes
1193 and recall disputes are not eligible for presuit mediation;
1194 these disputes must be arbitrated by the department or filed in
1195 a court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitration proceeding
1196 must be conducted by a department arbitrator or by a private
1197 arbitrator certified by the department. At the conclusion of an
1198 arbitration proceeding, the department shall charge the parties
1199 a fee in an amount adequate to cover all costs and expenses
1200 incurred by the department in conducting the proceeding.
Page 48 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1201 Initially, the petitioner shall remit a filing fee of at least
1202 $200 to the department. The fees paid to the department shall
1203 become a recoverable cost in the arbitration proceeding, and the
1204 prevailing party in an arbitration proceeding shall recover its
1205 reasonable costs and attorney fees in an amount found reasonable
1206 by the arbitrator. The department shall adopt rules to
1207 effectuate the purposes of this section.
1208 (2)(a) Disputes between an association and a parcel owner
1209 regarding use of or changes to the parcel or the common areas
1210 and other covenant enforcement disputes, disputes regarding
1211 amendments to the association documents, disputes regarding
1212 meetings of the board and committees appointed by the board,
1213 membership meetings not including election meetings, and access
1214 to the official records of the association shall be the subject
1215 of a demand for presuit mediation served by an aggrieved party
1216 before the dispute is filed in court. Presuit mediation
1217 proceedings must be conducted in accordance with the applicable
1218 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, and these proceedings are
1219 privileged and confidential to the same extent as court-ordered
1220 mediation. Disputes subject to presuit mediation under this
1221 section shall not include the collection of any assessment,
1222 fine, or other financial obligation, including attorney's fees
1223 and costs, claimed to be due or any action to enforce a prior
1224 mediation settlement agreement between the parties. Also, in any
1225 dispute subject to presuit mediation under this section where
Page 49 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1226 emergency relief is required, a motion for temporary injunctive
1227 relief may be filed with the court without first complying with
1228 the presuit mediation requirements of this section. After any
1229 issues regarding emergency or temporary relief are resolved, the
1230 court may either refer the parties to a mediation program
1231 administered by the courts or require mediation under this
1232 section. An arbitrator or judge may not consider any information
1233 or evidence arising from the presuit mediation proceeding except
1234 in a proceeding to impose sanctions for failure to attend a
1235 presuit mediation session or to enforce a mediated settlement
1236 agreement. Persons who are not parties to the dispute may not
1237 attend the presuit mediation conference without the consent of
1238 all parties, except for counsel for the parties and a corporate
1239 representative designated by the association. When mediation is
1240 attended by a quorum of the board, such mediation is not a board
1241 meeting for purposes of notice and participation set forth in s.
1242 720.303. An aggrieved party shall serve on the responding party
1243 a written demand to participate in presuit mediation in
1244 substantially the following form:
1245 STATUTORY OFFER TO PARTICIPATE
1246 IN PRESUIT MEDIATION
1247 The alleged aggrieved party, ................, hereby
1248 demands that ................, as the responding
1249 party, engage in mandatory presuit mediation in
1250 connection with the following disputes, which by
Page 50 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1251 statute are of a type that are subject to presuit
1252 mediation:
1253 (List specific nature of the dispute or disputes to be
1254 mediated and the authority supporting a finding of a
1255 violation as to each dispute.)
1256 Pursuant to section 720.311, Florida Statutes, this
1257 demand to resolve the dispute through presuit
1258 mediation is required before a lawsuit can be filed
1259 concerning the dispute. Pursuant to the statute, the
1260 parties are required to engage in presuit mediation
1261 with a neutral third-party mediator in order to
1262 attempt to resolve this dispute without court action,
1263 and the aggrieved party demands that you likewise
1264 agree to this process. If you fail to participate in
1265 the mediation process, suit may be brought against you
1266 without further warning.
1267 The process of mediation involves a supervised
1268 negotiation process in which a trained, neutral third-
1269 party mediator meets with both parties and assists
1270 them in exploring possible opportunities for resolving
1271 part or all of the dispute. By agreeing to participate
1272 in presuit mediation, you are not bound in any way to
1273 change your position. Furthermore, the mediator has no
1274 authority to make any decisions in this matter or to
1275 determine who is right or wrong and merely acts as a
Page 51 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1276 facilitator to ensure that each party understands the
1277 position of the other party and that all options for
1278 reasonable settlement are fully explored.
1279 If an agreement is reached, it shall be reduced to
1280 writing and becomes a binding and enforceable
1281 commitment of the parties. A resolution of one or more
1282 disputes in this fashion avoids the need to litigate
1283 these issues in court. The failure to reach an
1284 agreement, or the failure of a party to participate in
1285 the process, results in the mediator declaring an
1286 impasse in the mediation, after which the aggrieved
1287 party may proceed to court on all outstanding,
1288 unsettled disputes. If you have failed or refused to
1289 participate in the entire mediation process, you will
1290 not be entitled to recover attorney's fees, even if
1291 you prevail.
1292 The aggrieved party has selected and hereby lists five
1293 certified mediators who we believe to be neutral and
1294 qualified to mediate the dispute. You have the right
1295 to select any one of these mediators. The fact that
1296 one party may be familiar with one or more of the
1297 listed mediators does not mean that the mediator
1298 cannot act as a neutral and impartial facilitator. Any
1299 mediator who cannot act in this capacity is required
1300 ethically to decline to accept engagement. The
Page 52 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1301 mediators that we suggest, and their current hourly
1302 rates, are as follows:
1303 (List the names, addresses, telephone numbers, and
1304 hourly rates of the mediators. Other pertinent
1305 information about the background of the mediators may
1306 be included as an attachment.)
1307 You may contact the offices of these mediators to
1308 confirm that the listed mediators will be neutral and
1309 will not show any favoritism toward either party. The
1310 Florida Supreme Court can provide you a list of
1311 certified mediators.
1312 Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, section
1313 720.311(2)(b), Florida Statutes, requires that the
1314 parties share the costs of presuit mediation equally,
1315 including the fee charged by the mediator. An average
1316 mediation may require three to four hours of the
1317 mediator's time, including some preparation time, and
1318 the parties would need to share equally the mediator's
1319 fees as well as their own attorney's fees if they
1320 choose to employ an attorney in connection with the
1321 mediation. However, use of an attorney is not required
1322 and is at the option of each party. The mediators may
1323 require the advance payment of some or all of the
1324 anticipated fees. The aggrieved party hereby agrees to
1325 pay or prepay one-half of the mediator's estimated
Page 53 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1326 fees and to forward this amount or such other
1327 reasonable advance deposits as the mediator requires
1328 for this purpose. Any funds deposited will be returned
1329 to you if these are in excess of your share of the
1330 fees incurred.
1331 To begin your participation in presuit mediation to
1332 try to resolve the dispute and avoid further legal
1333 action, please sign below and clearly indicate which
1334 mediator is acceptable to you. We will then ask the
1335 mediator to schedule a mutually convenient time and
1336 place for the mediation conference to be held. The
1337 mediation conference must be held within ninety (90)
1338 days of this date, unless extended by mutual written
1339 agreement. In the event that you fail to respond
1340 within 20 days from the date of this letter, or if you
1341 fail to agree to at least one of the mediators that we
1342 have suggested or to pay or prepay to the mediator
1343 one-half of the costs involved, the aggrieved party
1344 will be authorized to proceed with the filing of a
1345 lawsuit against you without further notice and may
1346 seek an award of attorney's fees or costs incurred in
1347 attempting to obtain mediation.
1348 Therefore, please give this matter your immediate
1349 attention. By law, your response must be mailed by
1350 certified mail, return receipt requested, and by
Page 54 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1351 first-class mail to the address shown on this demand.
1352 ........................
1353 ........................
1354 RESPONDING PARTY: YOUR SIGNATURE INDICATES YOUR
1355 AGREEMENT TO THAT CHOICE.
1356 AGREEMENT TO MEDIATE
1357 The undersigned hereby agrees to participate in
1358 presuit mediation and agrees to attend a mediation
1359 conducted by the following mediator or mediators who
1360 are listed above as someone who would be acceptable to
1361 mediate this dispute:
1362 (List acceptable mediator or mediators.)
1363 I/we further agree to pay or prepay one-half of the
1364 mediator's fees and to forward such advance deposits
1365 as the mediator may require for this purpose.
1366 ........................
1367 Signature of responding party #1
1368 ........................
1369 Telephone contact information
1370 ........................
1371 Signature and telephone contact information of
1372 responding party #2 (if applicable)(if property is
1373 owned by more than one person, all owners must sign)
1374 (b) Service of the statutory demand to participate in
1375 presuit mediation shall be effected by sending a letter in
Page 55 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1376 substantial conformity with the above form by certified mail,
1377 return receipt requested, with an additional copy being sent by
1378 regular first-class mail, to the address of the responding party
1379 as it last appears on the books and records of the association.
1380 The responding party has 20 days from the date of the mailing of
1381 the statutory demand to serve a response to the aggrieved party
1382 in writing. The response shall be served by certified mail,
1383 return receipt requested, with an additional copy being sent by
1384 regular first-class mail, to the address shown on the statutory
1385 demand. Notwithstanding the foregoing, once the parties have
1386 agreed on a mediator, the mediator may reschedule the mediation
1387 for a date and time mutually convenient to the parties. The
1388 parties shall share the costs of presuit mediation equally,
1389 including the fee charged by the mediator, if any, unless the
1390 parties agree otherwise, and the mediator may require advance
1391 payment of its reasonable fees and costs. The failure of any
1392 party to respond to a demand or response, to agree upon a
1393 mediator, to make payment of fees and costs within the time
1394 established by the mediator, or to appear for a scheduled
1395 mediation session without the approval of the mediator, shall
1396 constitute the failure or refusal to participate in the
1397 mediation process and shall operate as an impasse in the presuit
1398 mediation by such party, entitling the other party to proceed in
1399 court and to seek an award of the costs and fees associated with
1400 the mediation. Additionally, notwithstanding the provisions of
Page 56 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1401 any other law or document, persons who fail or refuse to
1402 participate in the entire mediation process may not recover
1403 attorney's fees and costs in subsequent litigation relating to
1404 the dispute. If any presuit mediation session cannot be
1405 scheduled and conducted within 90 days after the offer to
1406 participate in mediation was filed, an impasse shall be deemed
1407 to have occurred unless both parties agree to extend this
1408 deadline.
1409 (2)(c) In If presuit mediation as described in paragraph
1410 (a) is not successful in resolving all issues between the
1411 parties, the parties may file the unresolved dispute in a court
1412 of competent jurisdiction or elect to enter into binding or
1413 nonbinding arbitration pursuant to the procedures set forth in
1414 s. 718.1255 and rules adopted by the division, with the
1415 arbitration proceeding to be conducted by a department
1416 arbitrator or by a private arbitrator certified by the
1417 department. If all parties do not agree to arbitration
1418 proceedings following an unsuccessful presuit mediation, any
1419 party may file the dispute in court. A final order resulting
1420 from nonbinding arbitration is final and enforceable in the
1421 courts if a complaint for trial de novo is not filed in a court
1422 of competent jurisdiction within 30 days after entry of the
1423 order. As to any issue or dispute that is not resolved at
1424 arbitration presuit mediation, and as to any issue that is
1425 settled at arbitration presuit mediation but is thereafter
Page 57 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1426 subject to an action seeking enforcement of the mediation
1427 settlement, the prevailing party in any subsequent arbitration
1428 or litigation proceeding may shall be entitled to seek recovery
1429 of all costs and attorney attorney's fees incurred in the
1430 arbitration presuit mediation process.
1431 (3)(d) An A mediator or arbitrator is shall be authorized
1432 to conduct mediation or arbitration under this section only if
1433 he or she has been certified as a circuit court civil mediator
1434 or arbitrator, respectively, pursuant to the requirements
1435 established by the Florida Supreme Court. Settlement agreements
1436 resulting from mediation shall not have precedential value in
1437 proceedings involving parties other than those participating in
1438 the mediation to support either a claim or defense in other
1439 disputes.
1440 (e) The presuit mediation procedures provided by this
1441 subsection may be used by a Florida corporation responsible for
1442 the operation of a community in which the voting members are
1443 parcel owners or their representatives, in which membership in
1444 the corporation is not a mandatory condition of parcel
1445 ownership, or which is not authorized to impose an assessment
1446 that may become a lien on the parcel.
1447 Section 17. Section 720.319, Florida Statutes, is created
1448 to read:
1449 720.319 Dissolution of homeowners' association.—
1450 (1) This section may be cited as the "Homeowners'
Page 58 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1451 Association Dissolution and Accountability Act."
1452 (2) The Legislature finds that:
1453 (a) Homeowners' associations are created as authorized by
1454 general law and are subject to covenants that encumber the land
1455 and restrict the use of real property.
1456 (b) In some circumstances, the continued enforcement of
1457 those covenants may no longer serve the homeowners' or
1458 community's interest and it is the public policy of this state
1459 to provide by general law a method to preserve the value of the
1460 property interests and the rights of alienation thereof that
1461 homeowners have in their parcels before and after termination.
1462 (c) It is contrary to the public policy of this state to
1463 require the continued operation of a homeowners' association
1464 when such continuation is made impossible by law or regulation.
1465 (d) It is in the best interest of this state to provide
1466 for termination of the declaration of covenants in certain
1467 circumstances in order to:
1468 1. Prevent covenants from impairing the continued
1469 productive use of the property.
1470 2. Provide fair treatment and just compensation for parcel
1471 owners and preserve property values and the local property tax
1472 base.
1473 3. Preserve the state's long history of protecting
1474 homestead property rights by ensuring that such protection is
1475 extended to parcel owners whose parcel is their homestead in the
Page 59 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1476 context of a termination of a declaration of covenants for an
1477 association.
1478 (3) A homeowners' association may be terminated by a plan
1479 of termination that meets the requirements of this section and
1480 is approved by a community association court program under s.
1481 720.32.
1482 (4) A plan of termination is subject to the following
1483 conditions:
1484 (a) The total voting interests of the association must
1485 include all voting interests for the purpose of considering a
1486 plan of termination. A voting interest of the association may
1487 not be suspended for any reason when voting on termination under
1488 this section.
1489 (b) If the members reject a plan of termination, a
1490 subsequent plan of termination under this section may not be
1491 considered for at least 18 months after the date of the
1492 rejection.
1493 (c) A plan of termination must be approved by at least
1494 two-thirds of the total voting interests of the association.
1495 (d) A parcel owner desiring to reject a plan of
1496 termination must do so by either voting in person or by proxy to
1497 reject the plan or by delivering a written objection to the
1498 association before or at the meeting called under subsection
1499 (5).
1500 (5)(a) A parcel owner who wishes to terminate a
Page 60 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1501 homeowners' association in which he or she is a member must
1502 provide to the board of administration a petition for a plan of
1503 termination that is signed by at least 50 percent of the voting
1504 members of the association. The board must notify the city in
1505 which the homeowners' association is located in writing,
1506 including, but not limited to, through e-mail, that a plan of
1507 termination has begun and hold a meeting of the members within
1508 60 days after receipt of the signed petition. A voting interest
1509 of the association may not be suspended for any reason for
1510 purposes of signing the petition or determining whether the 50
1511 percent threshold for such petition has been met under this
1512 paragraph.
1513 (b) Notice of such meeting must be made in accordance with
1514 s. 720.303(2) and include the following information:
1515 1. A copy of the proposed plan of dissolution.
1516 2. An explanation of how the common areas and the assets
1517 of the association will be managed or transferred.
1518 3. The manner in which voting will take place.
1519 (c) If the board fails to call a meeting within the 60-day
1520 time period, any member may petition a community association
1521 court program under s. 720.32 or, if a community association
1522 court program does not exist in the judicial circuit in which
1523 the association is located, another court of competent
1524 jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance with this
1525 section.
Page 61 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1526 (6) If a plan of termination is approved, the board must
1527 submit such plan to the community association court program in
1528 the judicial circuit in which the association is located or, if
1529 a community association court program does not exist, another
1530 court of competent jurisdiction. The court shall examine the
1531 plan of termination and determine its procedural sufficiency
1532 and, within 45 days after receipt of the plan, notify the
1533 association by mail of any procedural deficiencies or that the
1534 plan is accepted. If notice is not provided within the 45-day
1535 time period, the plan of termination is deemed accepted. If the
1536 court determines that the conditions required by this section
1537 have been met and that the plan of termination complies with the
1538 procedural requirements of this section, the court must
1539 authorize the termination and the termination may proceed as
1540 authorized in this section.
1541 (7)(a) A plan of termination and the consents or joinders
1542 of parcel owners must be recorded in the public records of each
1543 county in which any portion of the association is located. The
1544 plan is effective only upon recordation or at a later date
1545 specified in the plan.
1546 (b) Upon recordation or at a later date specified in the
1547 plan of termination, title to the association property vests in
1548 a termination trustee. The board serves as such trustee unless
1549 another person is appointed in the plan of termination. If the
1550 board is not the termination trustee, the board must transfer
Page 62 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1551 any association property to such trustee. The termination
1552 trustee is vested with the powers given by the declaration and
1553 bylaws of the association and subsection (9). If the board is
1554 unable, unwilling, or fails to act as termination trustee, a
1555 parcel owner may petition the community association court
1556 program to appoint a termination trustee.
1557 (8) If the board fails to hold the meeting under
1558 subsection (5), obstructs the termination process, or refuses to
1559 record the decision of the members to terminate, a member may
1560 file a petition with the community association court program in
1561 the judicial circuit in which the association is located or, if
1562 a community association court program does not exist, another
1563 court of competent jurisdiction. A community association court
1564 program may do all of the following:
1565 (a) Verify compliance with the procedural requirements of
1566 this section and all statutory voting requirements.
1567 (b) Order the Department of State to dissolve the
1568 homeowners' association.
1569 (c) Appoint a termination trustee to manage the
1570 distribution of assets and resolution of liabilities.
1571 (9) The approval of the plan of termination does not
1572 terminate the board of administration, which shall continue in
1573 existence following approval of the plan of termination with all
1574 powers and duties such board had before approval of the plan.
1575 Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the declaration
Page 63 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1576 or bylaws, after approval of the plan of termination the board
1577 must:
1578 (a) Employ directors, agents, attorneys, and other
1579 professionals to liquidate or conclude the board's affairs.
1580 (b) Conduct the affairs of the association as necessary
1581 for the liquidation or termination.
1582 (c) Carry out contracts and collect, pay, and settle debts
1583 and claims for and against the association.
1584 (d) Defend suits brought against the association.
1585 (e) Sue in the name of the association for all sums due or
1586 owed to the association or to recover any association property.
1587 (f) Perform any act necessary to maintain, repair, or
1588 demolish unsafe or uninhabitable improvements or other
1589 association property in compliance with applicable codes.
1590 (g) Sell at public or private sale or exchange, convey, or
1591 otherwise dispose of assets of the association for an amount
1592 deemed to be in the best interests of the association, and
1593 execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the
1594 association.
1595 (h) Collect and receive rents, profits, accounts
1596 receivable, income, maintenance fees, special assessments, or
1597 insurance proceeds for the association.
1598 (i) Contract and do anything in the name of the
1599 association which is proper or convenient to terminate the
1600 affairs of the association.
Page 64 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1601 (10)(a) All remaining association assets after the payment
1602 of any lawful debts must be distributed equally among members or
1603 as otherwise provided in the plan of termination.
1604 (b) A member may not be subject to personal liability for
1605 unpaid obligations beyond the member's regular assessments or
1606 special assessments that existed before the vote for
1607 termination.
1608 (11)(a) The following actions by an association or the
1609 officers or directors thereof are unlawful:
1610 1. Failing to call or notice a meeting after receipt of a
1611 valid petition for a plan of termination.
1612 2. Spending association funds to campaign for or against
1613 the plan of termination.
1614 3. Concealing any financial or property records relevant
1615 to the plan of termination.
1616 (b) An officer or a director who violates paragraph (a) is
1617 subject to any of the following:
1618 1. A civil penalty of up to $5,000 per violation.
1619 2. Removal from office by court order.
1620 3. Personal liability for legal fees incurred by the
1621 petitioners.
1622 Section 18. Section 720.32, Florida Statutes, is created
1623 to read:
1624 720.32 Community association court program.—
1625 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage and
Page 65 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1626 support the judicial circuits of the state to create and
1627 maintain a community association court program in each judicial
1628 circuit. The purpose of a community association court program is
1629 to provide an optional, voluntary process for community
1630 associations and the members thereof to address disputes as an
1631 alternative to entering into mediation or arbitration. It is the
1632 intent of the Legislature that this section provide a detailed
1633 statewide standard for the creation, operation, and procedures
1634 for community association court programs.
1635 (2) A circuit court may create and administer a community
1636 association court program. The chief judge shall designate at
1637 least one judge to preside over the community association court
1638 program. The chief judge may issue administrative orders
1639 concerning the community association court program.
1640 (3) The community association court program has
1641 jurisdiction over disputes, including any related termination or
1642 enforcement proceedings, arising under any of the following:
1643 (a) Chapter 718, the Condominium Act.
1644 (b) Chapter 719, the Cooperative Act.
1645 (c) Chapter 720, the Homeowners' Association Act.
1646 (4) The community association court program may do all of
1647 the following:
1648 (a) Enforce all statutory rights of unit owners and parcel
1649 owners.
1650 (b) Verify and compel compliance with all statutory
Page 66 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1651 requirements by community associations, boards of
1652 administration, and officers or directors of such boards.
1653 (c) Order the Department of State to dissolve a community
1654 association.
1655 (d) Appoint a termination trustee to manage the
1656 distribution of association assets and resolution of
1657 liabilities.
1658 (e) Impose civil penalties for violations of statutory
1659 rights.
1660 (f) Issue injunctive relief as appropriate.
1661 (g) Award reasonable attorney fees and costs as
1662 appropriate.
1663 (5) By January 1 of each year, the chief judge in each
1664 judicial circuit in which a community association court program
1665 is created shall submit to the President of the Senate and the
1666 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report that summarizes
1667 the caseload of each community association court program and the
1668 outcomes of such caseload.
1669 (6) The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall
1670 establish procedure, staffing, and reporting requirements for
1671 the operation of the community association court program.
1672 (7) The costs associated with the creation, operation, and
1673 compliance and enforcement duties of the community association
1674 court program shall be funded as authorized by and consistent
1675 with funding appropriated in the General Appropriations Act.
Page 67 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1676 (8) Funds specifically appropriated by an operating
1677 appropriation or a nonoperating transfer from the Division of
1678 Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes Trust Fund to
1679 the state court system to support judicial functions relating to
1680 community associations which remain unencumbered as of June 30
1681 or undisbursed as of September 30 each year shall revert to the
1682 Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes
1683 Trust Fund.
1684 (9) This section does not apply to timeshare condominium
1685 associations or timeshare cooperative associations unless the
1686 facilities of such associations include homestead condominium
1687 units or homestead cooperative units.
1688 Section 19. Subsections (11), (13), and (17) of section
1689 26.031, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1690 26.031 Judicial circuits; number of judges.—The number of
1691 circuit judges in each circuit shall be as follows:
1692 JUDICIAL CIRCUIT TOTAL
1693 (11) Eleventh..........................................8583
1694 (13) Thirteenth........................................4645
1695 (17) Seventeenth.......................................5958
1696 Section 20. The amendments made by this act to s. 26.031,
1697 Florida Statutes, are for the purpose of authorizing additional
1698 judgeships specifically for the community association court
1699 program created in s. 720.32, Florida Statutes, by this act.
1700 Section 21. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
Page 68 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1701 34.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1702 34.01 Jurisdiction of county court.—
1703 (1) County courts shall have original jurisdiction:
1704 (d) Of disputes occurring in the homeowners' associations
1705 as described in s. 720.311(2)(a), which shall be concurrent with
1706 jurisdiction of the circuit courts.
1707 Section 22. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1708 336.125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1709 336.125 Closing and abandonment of roads; optional
1710 conveyance to homeowners' association; traffic control
1711 jurisdiction.—
1712 (1)(a) In addition to the authority provided in s. 336.12,
1713 the governing body of the county may abandon the roads and
1714 rights-of-way dedicated in a recorded residential subdivision
1715 plat and simultaneously convey the county's interest in such
1716 roads, rights-of-way, and appurtenant drainage facilities to a
1717 homeowners' association for the subdivision, if the following
1718 conditions have been met:
1719 1. The homeowners' association has requested the
1720 abandonment and conveyance in writing for the purpose of
1721 converting the subdivision to a gated neighborhood with
1722 restricted public access.
1723 2. No fewer than four-fifths of the owners of record of
1724 property located in the subdivision have consented in writing to
1725 the abandonment and simultaneous conveyance to the homeowners'
Page 69 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1726 association.
1727 3. The homeowners' association is both a corporation not
1728 for profit organized and in good standing under chapter 617, and
1729 a "homeowners' association" as defined in s. 720.301 s.
1730 720.301(9) with the power to levy and collect assessments for
1731 routine and periodic major maintenance and operation of street
1732 lighting, drainage, sidewalks, and pavement in the subdivision.
1733 4. The homeowners' association has entered into and
1734 executed such agreements, covenants, warranties, and other
1735 instruments; has provided, or has provided assurance of, such
1736 funds, reserve funds, and funding sources; and has satisfied
1737 such other requirements and conditions as may be established or
1738 imposed by the county with respect to the ongoing operation,
1739 maintenance, and repair and the periodic reconstruction or
1740 replacement of the roads, drainage, street lighting, and
1741 sidewalks in the subdivision after the abandonment by the
1742 county.
1743 Section 23. Subsection (2) of section 558.002, Florida
1744 Statutes, is amended to read:
1745 558.002 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
1746 (2) "Association" has the same meaning as in s. 718.103,
1747 s. 719.103(2), s. 720.301(10) s. 720.301(9), or s. 723.075.
1748 Section 24. Subsection (6) of section 617.0601, Florida
1749 Statutes, is amended to read:
1750 617.0601 Members, generally.—
Page 70 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1751 (6) Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) do not apply to a
1752 corporation that is an association as defined in s. 720.301(10)
1753 s. 720.301.
1754 Section 25. Subsection (6) of section 617.0701, Florida
1755 Statutes, is amended to read:
1756 617.0701 Meetings of members, generally; failure to hold
1757 annual meeting; special meeting; consent to corporate actions
1758 without meetings; waiver of notice of meetings.—
1759 (6) Subsections (1) and (3) do not apply to any
1760 corporation that is an association as defined in s. 720.301(10)
1761 s. 720.301; a corporation regulated by chapter 718, chapter 719,
1762 chapter 720, chapter 721, or chapter 723; or a corporation where
1763 membership in such corporation is required pursuant to a
1764 document recorded in the county property records.
1765 Section 26. Subsection (7) of section 617.0721, Florida
1766 Statutes, is amended to read:
1767 617.0721 Voting by members.—
1768 (7) Subsections (1), (5), and (6) do not apply to a
1769 corporation that is an association, as defined in s. 720.301(10)
1770 s. 720.301, or a corporation regulated by chapter 718 or chapter
1771 719.
1772 Section 27. Section 617.0725, Florida Statutes, is amended
1773 to read:
1774 617.0725 Quorum.—An amendment to the articles of
1775 incorporation or the bylaws which adds, changes, or deletes a
Page 71 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1776 greater or lesser quorum or voting requirement must meet the
1777 same quorum or voting requirement and be adopted by the same
1778 vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum
1779 and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be
1780 adopted, whichever is greater. This section does not apply to
1781 any corporation that is an association, as defined in s.
1782 720.301(10) s. 720.301(9), or any corporation regulated under
1783 chapter 718 or chapter 719.
1784 Section 28. Subsection (3) of section 617.0808, Florida
1785 Statutes, is amended to read:
1786 617.0808 Removal of directors.—
1787 (3) This section does not apply to any corporation that is
1788 an association, as defined in s. 720.301(10) s. 720.301, or a
1789 corporation regulated under chapter 718 or chapter 719.
1790 Section 29. Section 617.1606, Florida Statutes, is amended
1791 to read:
1792 617.1606 Access to records.—Sections 617.1601-617.1605 do
1793 not apply to a corporation that is an association, as defined in
1794 s. 720.301(10) s. 720.301, or a corporation regulated under
1795 chapter 718 or chapter 719.
1796 Section 30. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1797 718.116, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1798 718.116 Assessments; liability; lien and priority;
1799 interest; collection.—
1800 (1)
Page 72 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1801 (b)1. The liability of a first mortgagee or its successor
1802 or assignees who acquire title to a unit by foreclosure or by
1803 deed in lieu of foreclosure for the unpaid assessments that
1804 became due before the mortgagee's acquisition of title is
1805 limited to the lesser of:
1806 a. The unit's unpaid common expenses and regular periodic
1807 assessments which accrued or came due during the 12 months
1808 immediately preceding the acquisition of title and for which
1809 payment in full has not been received by the association; or
1810 b. One percent of the original mortgage debt. The
1811 provisions of this paragraph apply only if the first mortgagee
1812 joined the association as a defendant in the foreclosure action.
1813 Joinder of the association is not required if, on the date the
1814 complaint is filed, the association was dissolved or did not
1815 maintain an office or agent for service of process at a location
1816 which was known to or reasonably discoverable by the mortgagee.
1817 2. An association, or its successor or assignee, that
1818 acquires title to a unit through the foreclosure of its lien for
1819 assessments is not liable for any unpaid assessments, late fees,
1820 interest, or reasonable attorney's fees and costs that came due
1821 before the association's acquisition of title in favor of any
1822 other association, as defined in s. 718.103 or s. 720.301(10) s.
1823 720.301(9), which holds a superior lien interest on the unit.
1824 This subparagraph is intended to clarify existing law.
1825 Section 31. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
Page 73 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1826 (e) of subsection (2) of section 718.503, Florida Statutes, are
1827 amended to read:
1828 718.503 Developer disclosure prior to sale; nondeveloper
1829 unit owner disclosure prior to sale; voidability.—
1830 (1) DEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1831 (d) Milestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or
1832 structural integrity reserve study.—If the association is
1833 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described
1834 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1835 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1836 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed
1837 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the
1838 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into
1839 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit
1840 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that
1841 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a
1842 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve
1843 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study,
1844 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a
1845 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural
1846 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1847 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1848 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the
1849 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a
1850 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the
Page 74 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1851 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in
1852 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1853 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1854 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1855 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1856 contain in conspicuous type:
1857 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1858 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1859 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1860 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1861 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1862 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1863 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1864 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND
1865 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15
1866 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1867 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1868 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1869 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
1870 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1871 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1872 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1873 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1874 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1875 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
Page 75 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1876 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1877 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1878 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND
1879 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1880 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1881 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15
1882 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1883 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
1884 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1885 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
1886 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
1887 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1888 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1889 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1890 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1891 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1892
1893 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1894 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
1895 closing.
1896 (2) NONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1897 (e) If the association is required to have completed a
1898 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover
1899 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or
1900 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and
Page 76 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1901 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the
1902 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve
1903 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for
1904 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type
1905 a statement indicating that the association is required to have
1906 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a
1907 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such
1908 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association
1909 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in
1910 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each
1911 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a
1912 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement
1913 indicating that the association is not required to have a
1914 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as
1915 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone
1916 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection
1917 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1,
1918 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract
1919 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a
1920 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type:
1921 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1922 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1923 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1924 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1925 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
Page 77 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1926 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1927 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1928 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND
1929 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7
1930 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1931 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1932 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1933 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
1934 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1935 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1936 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1937 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1938 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1939 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1940 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1941 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1942 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND
1943 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1944 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1945 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7
1946 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1947 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
1948 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1949 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
1950 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
Page 78 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1951 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1952 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1953 718.103(29) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1954 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1955 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1956
1957 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1958 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
1959 closing.
1960 Section 32. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
1961 (d) of subsection (2) of section 719.503, Florida Statutes, are
1962 amended to read:
1963 719.503 Disclosure prior to sale.—
1964 (1) DEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1965 (d) Milestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or
1966 structural integrity reserve study.—If the association is
1967 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described
1968 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1969 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1970 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed
1971 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the
1972 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into
1973 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit
1974 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that
1975 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a
Page 79 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
1976 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve
1977 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study,
1978 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a
1979 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural
1980 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1981 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1982 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the
1983 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a
1984 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the
1985 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in
1986 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1987 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1988 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1989 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1990 contain in conspicuous type:
1991 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1992 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1993 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1994 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1995 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1996 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1997 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1998 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
1999 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15
2000 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
Page 80 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
2001 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
2002 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
2003 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
2004 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
2005 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
2006 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2007 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2008 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2009 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2010 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2011 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2012 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
2013 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
2014 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
2015 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15
2016 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
2017 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
2018 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
2019 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
2020 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 719.301(4)(p) AND (q),
2021 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
2022 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
2023 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
2024 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
2025 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
Page 81 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
2026
2027 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
2028 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
2029 closing.
2030 (2) NONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
2031 (d) If the association is required to have completed a
2032 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover
2033 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or
2034 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and
2035 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the
2036 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve
2037 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for
2038 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type
2039 a statement indicating that the association is required to have
2040 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a
2041 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such
2042 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association
2043 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in
2044 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each
2045 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a
2046 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement
2047 indicating that the association is not required to have a
2048 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as
2049 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone
2050 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection
Page 82 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
2051 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1,
2052 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract
2053 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a
2054 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type:
2055 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
2056 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2057 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2058 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2059 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2060 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2061 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2062 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
2063 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7
2064 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
2065 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
2066 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
2067 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
2068 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
2069 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
2070 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2071 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2072 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2073 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2074 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2075 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
Page 83 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
2076 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
2077 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
2078 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
2079 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7
2080 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
2081 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
2082 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
2083 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
2084 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 719.301(4)(p) AND (q),
2085 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
2086 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
2087 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
2088 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
2089 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
2090
2091 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
2092 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
2093 closing.
2094 Section 33. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
2095 720.3085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2096 720.3085 Payment for assessments; lien claims.—
2097 (2)
2098 (d) An association, or its successor or assignee, that
2099 acquires title to a parcel through the foreclosure of its lien
2100 for assessments is not liable for any unpaid assessments, late
Page 84 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/CS/HB 657, Engrossed 1 2026
2101 fees, interest, or reasonable attorney's fees and costs that
2102 came due before the association's acquisition of title in favor
2103 of any other association, as defined in s. 718.103 or s.
2104 720.301(10) s. 720.301(9), which holds a superior lien interest
2105 on the parcel. This paragraph is intended to clarify existing
2106 law.
2107 Section 34. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2108 made by this act to section 720.3035, Florida Statutes, in a
2109 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 617.0825, Florida
2110 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2111 617.0825 Board committees and advisory committees.—
2112 (9) This section does not apply to a committee established
2113 under chapter 718, chapter 719, or chapter 720 to perform the
2114 functions set forth in s. 718.303(3), s. 719.303(3), s.
2115 720.3035(1), s. 720.305(2), or s. 720.405, respectively.
2116 Section 35. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 85 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb657 -05-e1